apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="l/us__n">
<e>       <p><l>usene</l> <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ysene</l> <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>yser</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usa</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usi</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numer/us__n">
<e>       <p><l>iane</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usane</l> <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>i</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usen</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="papyr/us__n">
<e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usane</l> <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usar</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usen</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dinosaur/us__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>iane</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>iar</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dekan/us__n">
<e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="temp/us__n">
<e r="LR"><p><l>ora</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oraa</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>orai</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usa</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usi</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ora</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>uset</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gen/us__n">
<e r="LR"><p><l>era</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>eraa</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usa</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usane</l> <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usi</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>era</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usen</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>era</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>eraa</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>erai</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>usa</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usane</l> <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>usi</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>era</l>   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>uset</l>  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>us</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="fiskeh/ank__n">
<e>       <p><l>enkene</l><r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>enker</l> <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>anka</l>  <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>anki</l>  <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ank</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tema__n">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="ty__n"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="godt__n">
<!-- karakteren 'godt' er <m><sp>, tidsalderen karbon au: -->
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>et</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hum/mel__n">
<e>       <p><l>lane</l>  <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>lar</l>   <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>melen</l> <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>mel</l>   <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>mel</l>   <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="data"><i>data</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="vita">            <i>vita</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="tema">            <i>tema</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="firma">           <i>firma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="godt">            <i>godt</i><par n="godt__n"/></e>
<e lm="genus">           <i>gen</i><par n="gen/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="drama">           <i>drama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="klima">           <i>klima</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="karbon">          <i>karbon</i><par n="godt__n"/></e>
<e lm="komma">           <i>komma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="middelhavsklima"> <i>middelhavsklima</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="advokatfirma"><i>advokatfirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="aksjonsradius"><i>aksjonsradi</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="auksjonarius"><i>auksjonari</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="dekanus"><i>dekan</i><par n="dekan/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="dilemma"><i>dilemma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="diskusjonstema"><i>diskusjonstema</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="entreprenørfirma"><i>entreprenørfirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="familiedrama"><i>familiedrama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="genius"><i>geni</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="gisseldrama"><i>gisseldrama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomgangstema"><i>gjennomgangstema</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="grossistfirma"><i>grossistfirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="høgsterettsjustitiarius"><i>høgsterettsjustitiari</i><par n="dekan/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="importfirma"><i>importfirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="innlandsklima"><i>innlandsklima</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="justitiarius"><i>justitiari</i><par n="dekan/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="konsulentfirma"><i>konsulentfirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="kystklima"><i>kystklima</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="melodrama"><i>melodrama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="modus"><i>mod</i><par n="numer/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="numerus"><i>numer</i><par n="numer/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="panorama"><i>panorama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="plasma"><i>plasma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="postordrefirma"><i>postordrefirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="radius"><i>radi</i><par n="papyr/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="samtidsdrama"><i>samtidsdrama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="shippingfirma"><i>shippingfirma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="sjalusidrama"><i>sjalusidrama</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="skisma"><i>skisma</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="skjema"><i>skjema</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
<e lm="stimulus"><i>stimul</i><par n="numer/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="søknadsskjema"><i>søknadsskjema</i><par n="tema__n"/></e>
